Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5 Solicitation of Charitable Funds
48-101-513. Violations — Required notices, disclosures, records.

No charitable organization subject to this part shall solicit funds from the public, except for charitable purposes, or expend funds raised for charitable purposes for noncharitable purposes.

Unfair, false, misleading or deceptive acts and practices affecting the conduct of solicitations for contributions are declared unlawful. No person shall use or intend to use false or materially misleading advertising or promotional material in connection with any solicitation for a charitable organization or a charitable purpose. It is the intent of the general assembly that the courts in interpreting this provision should look to the judicial interpretations given the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1, and § 5(A)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act (15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(1)), for guidance.

No charitable organization subject to this part shall use or exploit the fact of registration so as to lead the public to believe that such registration in any manner constitutes an endorsement or approval by the state, but the use of the following statement shall not be deemed a prohibited exploitation: “Registered with the Tennessee Secretary of State as required by law. Registration No. .”

No person shall, in connection with the solicitation of contributions for or the sale of goods or services of, a person other than a charitable organization, misrepresent to or mislead anyone by any manner, means, practice or device whatsoever, to believe that the person on whose behalf such solicitation or sale is being conducted is a charitable organization, or that the proceeds of such solicitation or sale will be used for charitable purposes, if such is not the fact.

No person shall, in connection with the solicitation of contributions or the sale of goods or services for charitable purposes, represent to or lead anyone by any manner, means, practice or device whatsoever, to believe that any other person sponsors or endorses such solicitation of contributions, sale of goods or services for charitable purposes or approves of such charitable purposes, or a charitable organization connected therewith, when such person has not given written consent to the use of such person's name for these purposes; any member of the board of directors or trustees of a charitable organization or any other person who has agreed either to serve or to participate in any voluntary capacity in the campaign shall be deemed thereby to have given such member's consent to the use of such member's name in the campaign.

No person shall make any representation that such person is soliciting contributions for or on behalf of a charitable organization or shall use or display any emblem, device or printed matter belonging to or associated with a charitable organization for the purpose of soliciting or inducing contributions from the public without first being authorized to do so by the charitable organization.

No professional solicitor shall solicit, in any manner whatsoever, in the name of a charitable organization, whether exempt from this part or not, unless:

Prior to the commencement of each solicitation campaign, a completed solicitation campaign notice has been filed by a professional solicitor with the secretary of state on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Such notice shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the solicitation event or campaign, the location and the telephone number from which the solicitation is to be conducted, and the names and residence addresses of each employee or other person who is working in connection with such campaign. An authorized official of the charitable organization on whose behalf the professional solicitor is acting, as well as an authorized official of the professional solicitor, shall certify that the solicitation campaign notice is true and complete. Within seventy-two (72) hours after any modifications or changes in the information or documentation required herein, the secretary of state shall be notified in writing of such changes;

Prior to beginning any solicitation, such professional solicitor has filed with the secretary of state a true copy of any written agreement or contract which may have been entered into between a charitable organization and the professional solicitor, which shall state the minimum amount or percentage, if any, which a charitable organization shall receive of revenues solicited, after solicitation expenses, as a result of a solicitation campaign;

If any agreement or contract between a professional solicitor and a charitable organization is oral, a written summary of the agreement or contract which sets forth the terms, conditions, fees, percentage splits and costs of the oral agreement or contract must be submitted to the secretary of state prior to beginning any solicitation or sales promotion campaigns;

Within seven (7) days of any change, modification or termination of any agreement or contract that a professional solicitor has entered into with a charitable organization, a notice of such change, modification or termination must be filed with the secretary of state, along with a true copy of the new agreement which includes the changes and modifications in the terms, conditions, fees, percentage splits and costs.

A paid solicitor shall be responsible for complying with, or for causing compliance with, each of the following requirements:

Prior to orally requesting a contribution, or contemporaneously with a written request for a contribution, it shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed at the point of solicitation the name of the paid solicitor as on file with the division and that the solicitation is being conducted by a paid solicitor;

In the case of a solicitation campaign conducted orally, whether by telephone or otherwise, a written confirmation shall be sent to each person who has contributed or pledged to contribute, within five (5) days after that person has been solicited, which shall include a clear and conspicuous disclosure of the information required by subdivision (h)(1)(A); and

It shall not be represented that tickets to events will be donated for use by another, unless the following requirements have been met:

The paid solicitor has commitments in writing from charitable organizations stating that they will accept donated tickets and specifying the number of tickets they are willing to accept; and

No person or organization, subject to this part, who fails to file any registration application, statement, report, or other information required to be filed with the secretary of state under this part as a prerequisite to registration shall engage in any of the activities permitted duly registered persons or organizations under this part. No person or organization shall engage in charitable solicitation without a current registration; and

No professional solicitor shall engage in solicitations on behalf of a nonexempt charitable organization, if such professional solicitor has knowledge that such nonexempt organization has failed to file a registration application with the secretary of state.

A professional solicitor, such professional solicitor's agent, servant or employee shall disclose upon request by the solicitee the percentage of gross contributions raised by the professional solicitor which shall be received by the charitable organization after solicitation expenses, if known, or otherwise disclose the guaranteed minimum contract amount, which the charitable organization shall receive as a result of the solicitation campaign.

Any charitable organization that places or maintains a collection receptacle in public view for the purpose of collecting donated clothing, household items, or similar goods shall clearly and conspicuously display on two (2) sides, including the front, of each collection receptacle a permanent sign or label with the charitable organization's name, address, phone number, electronic mail address, and a statement expressing the charitable purpose for which the charitable organization exists.

Any person who is not a charitable organization and who places or maintains a collection receptacle in public view for the purpose of collecting donated clothing, household items, or similar goods, for resale for the purpose of retaining the proceeds of the sale of the items, shall clearly and conspicuously display on two (2) sides, including the front, of each collection receptacle a permanent sign or label with the person's name, address, phone number, electronic mail address, and the following statement:

THIS IS NOT A CHARITY. DONATIONS MADE HERE WILL BE SOLD BY A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS AND ARE NOT TAX-DEDUCTIBLE.

Any person who is not a charitable organization and who places or maintains a collection receptacle in public view for the purpose of collecting donated clothing, household items, or similar goods, for resale for the purpose of paying over all or a portion of the proceeds from the sales to a charitable organization, shall display on two (2) sides, including the front, of each collection receptacle a permanent sign or label with the following statement:

DONATIONS MADE HERE WILL BE SOLD BY A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS, AND A PORTION OF THE PROCEEDS WILL BE PAID TO [NAME OF CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION]. FURTHER INFORMATION ABOUT THESE PAYMENTS CAN BE OBTAINED FROM [NAME OF PERSON OPERATING COLLECTION RECEPTACLE] AT [PHONE NUMBER AND ELECTRONIC MAIL ADDRESS] AND FROM [NAME OF CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION] AT [PHONE NUMBER AND ELECTRONIC MAIL ADDRESS].

The provisions of § 48-101-507 regarding professional solicitors shall apply to any person who places or maintains a collection receptacle pursuant to this subdivision (l )(3).

Any person who places or maintains a collection receptacle pursuant to this subdivision (l )(3) is not required to comply with the recordkeeping requirements of subdivision (h)(2).

The sign or labels required by this subsection (l ) shall be placed on two (2) sides of the collection receptacle, including the front, with the required information printed in letters that are at least two inches (2”) in height or as large as the largest letter on the box, whichever is greater, and in a color that contrasts with the color of the collection receptacle so that the sign or label is clearly visible.

Prior to placing any collection receptacle that is subject to this subsection (l ), the person placing the collection receptacle shall obtain notarized written permission to place and operate the collection receptacle from the owner or all leaseholders of the property where the collection receptacle is to be located. Copies of the notarized written permission shall be maintained by the person placing the collection receptacle and provided to the owner or any leaseholder of the property at any time upon request. If the notarized written permission to place and operate the collection receptacle is obtained from the property owner, the person placing the collection receptacle shall notify all leaseholders, tenants, or other occupants of the property owner's consent to the placement of the collection receptacle on the property.

The notarized written permission required by this subdivision (l )(5) shall include the signature of the person placing the collection receptacle, or that person's authorized agent, and of the owner or all leaseholders of the property who have the authority to permit or allow structures, such as collection receptacles, to be placed on the property.

The person placing the collection receptacle shall maintain the collection receptacle in a structurally sound, clean, and sanitary condition, and regularly empty the collection receptacle at least every two (2) weeks. The person placing the collection receptacle shall also be responsible for ensuring that no donations are present on the ground area surrounding the collection receptacle for a time period exceeding twenty-four (24) hours.

The owner or any one (1) leaseholder of the property may request removal of a collection receptacle by submitting a written request and sending it to the address listed on the collection receptacle pursuant to subdivision (l )(1), (l )(2), or (l )(3), as applicable. The owner or leaseholder of the property shall also send a copy of the written request to the office of the secretary of state.

The person placing the collection receptacle shall remove the collection receptacle as well as any contents left in and around the collection receptacle within thirty (30) days of receiving written notification of removal from the owner or any one (1) leaseholder of the property.

If the person placing the collection receptacle fails to remove the collection receptacle following the expiration of the thirty-day period, the owner or any one (1) leaseholder of the property shall have the right, without providing any additional notice to the person who placed the collection receptacle on the property, to take possession of, remove, and dispose of the collection receptacle and the contents thereof without incurring any civil or criminal liability for such actions. Any charges incurred in the removal and disposal of the collection receptacle by the owner or leaseholder of the property shall be invoiced to, and paid by, the person who placed the collection receptacle on the property.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (l )(7)(A)-(C), the owner or any one (1) leaseholder of the property may request immediate removal of a collection receptacle if the person who placed the collection receptacle on the property never received notarized written permission pursuant to subdivision (l )(5).

Any violation of subdivisions (l )(1)-(5) constitutes a solicitation of contributions by unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive means or manner, and may be investigated under § 48-101-514.

The secretary of state may impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any violation of this subsection (l ).

Any person who is sanctioned by the secretary of state for a violation of this subsection (l ) may seek review of the secretary of state's decision by requesting a contested case hearing, which shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Civil penalties imposed under this subsection (l ) shall be enforced in the manner prescribed by § 48-101-514.

Any owner or leaseholder of the property who suffers loss of money for removing or disposing of any collection receptacle or its contents following the expiration of the thirty-day period referred to in subdivision (l )(7)(B), or for any violation of subdivision (l )(6), may bring an action individually to recover actual damages.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the collection receptacle was removed, in the county in which the person who placed the collection receptacle conducts, transacts, or has transacted business, or, if the person who placed the collection receptacle cannot be found in any of the foregoing locations, in the county in which the person who placed the collection receptacle can be found.

No more contributions for donated tickets shall be solicited than the number of ticket commitments received from charitable organizations.

The professional solicitor shall maintain a record of the names of donors, their addresses and the date that their donations were received for a three-year period after a solicitation campaign has been completed. No donor list, information or documentation, required to be maintained under this subsection (h), which is obtained by the secretary of state pursuant to this part, unless otherwise ordered by a court for good cause shown, shall be produced for inspection, copied by or its contents disclosed to any person other than an authorized representative of the secretary of state, the attorney general and reporter or the attorney general and reporter's representative, or other proper law enforcement officials for the purpose of enforcing this part or prosecuting other criminal or civil violations, without the consent of the person who produced the information or documentation. The secretary of state, the attorney general and reporter or the attorney general and reporter's representative or other proper law enforcement officials may use such information or documentation as determined necessary in the enforcement of this part or other criminal or civil laws, including the presentation as part of any administrative or judicial proceedings.

Prior to the commencement of each solicitation campaign, a professional solicitor shall file with the secretary of state copies, or samples, of each type of solicitation campaign literature or promotional materials utilized in the solicitation campaign, including, but not limited to, the text of any solicitation scripts or pitches made to the public orally, which is utilized in the campaign. Within seven (7) days after any modification or changes in campaign solicitation literature or promotional materials utilized by the professional solicitor, the secretary of state shall be notified in writing and be given samples or copies of such changes and modifications.

No person shall, in connection with the solicitation of contributions or the sale of goods, magazines, newspaper advertising, or any other service, use the name “POLICE,” “FIREFIGHTER,” or “FIREMEN,” unless properly authorized by a bona fide police or firefighter organization or police or fire department. Such authorization must bear the signatures of two (2) bona fide members of the organization or department.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 13; T.C.A., § 48-2213; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 23-29; 1991, ch. 299, § 9; 1993, ch. 252, § 5; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 25-30; T.C.A., § 48-3-513; Acts 2007, ch. 523, §§ 25-33; 2015, ch. 221, § 1; 2017, ch. 146, §§ 7, 8.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 221, § 2 provided that the act, which added (m) [now (l )], shall apply to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. “Charitable purposes” and “noncharitable purposes” are not defined in the Charitable Solicitations Act. However, given the context in which those terms are used, “charitable purposes” would include activities in substantial furtherance of the benevolent, educational, voluntary health, philanthropic, humane, patriotic, religious, and eleemosynary work of a charitable organization. Whether lobbying at any governmental level or in any particular “amount” constitutes a “charitable purpose” or a “noncharitable purpose” within the meaning of the Act will depend on the particular facts and circumstances involved in any given instance. An “action organization” may or may not be a charitable organization, depending on the particular facts and circumstances in any given instance. Attempting to influence legislation and advocating or campaigning for objectives that may only be attained via the legislative process may or may not constitute a charitable purpose depending on the particular facts and circumstances involved in any given instance. Participating or intervening in any political campaign in support of or in opposition to any candidate for public office does not constitute a charitable purpose. OAG 16-41, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (12/6/2016).

48-101-514. Enforcement by secretary of state.

The secretary of state, upon the secretary of state's own motion or upon complaint of any person, if the secretary of state has reasonable ground to suspect any violation of this part or any rule thereunder or to aid in enforcement of this part, may publicly or privately investigate as the secretary of state deems necessary any charitable organization, professional solicitor or other person to determine whether such person or organization has filed any registration application or other information required under this part that contains false or misleading statements, has conducted any solicitation of contributions by any unfair, false, misleading or deceptive means or manner, or has otherwise violated any provision of this part. If the secretary of state finds that any application or other information contains false or misleading statements or that a registrant under this part has violated the provisions thereof, the secretary of state may find that such registrant's registration is improper or unlawful. Further, the secretary of state, or the secretary of state's authorized representative, may impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each and any violation of this part or a rule thereunder. Upon notice to the affected parties of an order by the secretary of state that registration is improper or unlawful and/or that sanctions should be imposed, including civil penalties, the affected party may seek review of that decision by requesting a contested case hearing, which shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any civil penalty shall be enforced in the following manner:

If a petition for review of the assessment of a penalty through a contested case hearing is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the affected party shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final;

Whenever any assessment has become final, because of a person's failure to appeal the secretary of state's assessment or otherwise, the secretary of state, in the name of the state, may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution on such judgment. The court, in such proceedings, shall treat the failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment; and

The secretary of state may institute proceedings for assessment in the chancery court of Davidson County or in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violation or failure to comply occurred, or in the county in which such person resides, has such person's principal place of conducting solicitations, or has conducted or transacted business or solicitation campaigns.

In conducting a public or private investigation as set forth in this part, the secretary of state or the secretary of state's authorized representative may issue subpoenas and summon witnesses, administer oaths to such witnesses, take the depositions of witnesses, compel the production of documents, exhibits, records or things, and require testimony on any issue related to the investigation.

The secretary of state may visit, investigate or place investigative personnel in the office or places of operation of a charitable organization or professional solicitor.

In addition to the authority to inspect fiscal or other records set forth in § 48-101-509, the secretary of state, in conducting a public or private investigation, may compel by either a request for production of documents, exhibits or things or subpoena duces tecum the presentation or delivery of all books, records, documents or other tangible items, by any person, which the secretary of state believes to be pertinent to the conduct of such investigation.

Subpoenas under this part may be served by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the addressee's registered mailing address, or by such personnel as the secretary of state may designate, or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides is conducting a solicitation campaign or is found or where such person in custody of any books, records or papers resides or is found.

In case of a refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person under this part, any circuit or chancery court of this state within the jurisdiction in which the person refusing to obey the subpoena resides or is found may issue to such person, upon application by the secretary of state, an order requiring such person to appear before the court to show cause why such person should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

At any time prior to the return date specified in the secretary of state's subpoena or request for production of documents, exhibits, or things pursuant to this subsection (b), or within the ten (10) days following service of such subpoena or request, whichever is shorter, any person from whom information has been requested may petition the circuit or chancery court of Davidson County, stating good cause, for a protective order to extend the return date for a reasonable time, or to modify or set aside the subpoena or request for production. The secretary of state shall receive at least one (1) day's notice of such a petition and shall be given an opportunity to respond.

Any person who has received a subpoena or request for production pursuant to this part, and who, with intent to avoid, evade or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, removes from any place, conceals, withholds, destroys, mutilates, falsifies or by any other means alters any documentary material in the possession, custody or control of any person subject to such notice, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) recoverable by the state in addition to any other appropriate sanction.

Whenever it appears to the secretary of state that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or order hereunder, and that proceeding would be in the public interest, the secretary of state may in the secretary of state's discretion bring an action, in the name of the state, through the attorney general and reporter in the circuit or chancery court of any county of this state, to:

Enjoin the acts, practices or violations of this part;

Impose civil penalties;

Appropriately remedy damages caused directly or indirectly by any violations of this part;

Prohibit the disposing of any contributions or altering in any other way the financial status of that person or organization;

Enforce compliance with this part or any rule or order hereunder; and

Provide other appropriate relief for violations of this part.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged violation of this part took place, is taking place, or is about to take place, or in the county in which such person resides, has such person's principal place of conducting solicitations, conducts, transacts, or has transacted solicitations or, if the person cannot be found in any of the foregoing locations, in the county in which such person can be found.

Upon a showing of a violation of this part, the courts are authorized to:

Issue orders to restrain or enjoin, temporarily or permanently, violations of this part;

Disgorge proceeds from unlawful solicitations;

Provide restitution to solicitees or injured charitable organizations;

Forfeit to the state any unlawfully obtained contributions;

Prohibit the disposal of assets or any contributions or the altering of the financial status of any person or organization in violation of this part;

Appoint a receiver or conservator of a defendant's assets; and

Grant other proper equitable relief.

The court may not require the secretary of state to post a bond, and no costs shall be taxed to the secretary of state in actions commenced under this part.

Whenever any order for injunctive relief or other relief is granted in an action, or pursuant to an application by the secretary of state in the name of the state under this part, reasonable costs, including the costs of investigation, and attorney's fees may be awarded to the secretary of state, for use by the secretary of state in defraying the costs of administering this part.

Any knowing violation of the terms of an injunction or order for other relief issued pursuant to subdivision (3) shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this part in any action brought pursuant to this section and is punishable by a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) recoverable by the state for each violation, in addition to any other appropriate relief.

The secretary of state, or the secretary of state's designee, may appear before any court of competent jurisdiction empowered to issue warrants of arrest in criminal cases and request the issuance of a warrant; upon presentation of probable cause, the court shall issue a warrant directed to any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or police officer.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 14; T.C.A., § 48-2214; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 30-32; 1991, ch. 299, §§ 10, 11; 1993, ch. 252, §§ 6-11; T.C.A., § 48-3-514.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Contempt of court, title 3, ch. 3; title 29, ch. 9.

48-101-515. Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provisions of this part or who willfully and knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the secretary of state, in filing statements or reports required by this part, whether such report or statement is verified or not, commits a Class B misdemeanor for the first offense, punishable as provided in § 40-35-111, and for the second and any subsequent offense commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 16; T.C.A., § 48-2216; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 43, 113; 1994, ch. 667, § 31; T.C.A., § 48-3-515.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

48-101-516. Foreign organizations and solicitors — Service of process.

Any charitable organization or professional solicitor which has its principal place of business without the state, or which is organized under and by virtue of the laws of a foreign state, and which solicits contributions from people in this state, shall be subject to this part and shall be deemed to have irrevocably appointed the secretary of state as its agent upon whom may be served any summons, subpoena duces tecum or other process directed to such charitable organization or professional solicitor or any partner, principal officer or director thereof in any action or proceeding brought under this part.

Service of such process upon the secretary of state shall be made by personally delivering to and leaving with the secretary of state a copy thereof at the capitol in Nashville. Such service shall be sufficient service; provided, that notice of such service and a copy of such process are forthwith sent to such charitable organization or professional solicitor by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested at its office, as set forth in the registration form required to be filed with the secretary of state pursuant to this part or, in default of the filing of such forms, at the last address known.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 48-2215, 48-3-516.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-101-517. Use of funds.

Funds collected under this part shall be used by the secretary of state to defray the cost of administering this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 20; T.C.A., §§ 48-2218, 48-3-517; Acts 2007, ch. 523, § 34.

48-101-518. Construction of part.

The powers and remedies provided in this part shall be cumulative and supplementary to all other powers and remedies otherwise provided by law. The invocation of one (1) power or remedy herein shall not be construed as excluding or prohibiting the use of any other available remedy.

This part shall not be construed to preempt any more stringent county or municipal provisions or to restrict local units of government from adopting more stringent provisions, and, in such case, such provisions shall be complied with if the registrant desires to solicit within the geographic district of the local unit of government.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to preempt any municipality from exercising general police powers of municipalities by ordinance or otherwise over organizations which are excluded from the application of this part or from organizations which are included within this part.

In the event this part, insofar as prohibited practices are concerned, conflicts with any ordinance or regulation of any municipality, the most restrictive provisions shall apply; further, such regulations or ordinances adopted by a municipality may be broader in scope and more restrictive in their application than this part.

Insofar as reporting or disclosure of financial reports is concerned, the right to require information not included in this part is hereby expressly reserved unto the municipalities of this state. Any municipality in this state is authorized to accept financial reports to the secretary of state as financial reports which may be required by municipal ordinances or regulations.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to require any municipality which has adopted, prior to July 1, 1977, ordinances or regulations controlling, omitting, or prohibiting certain types of solicitation practices to adopt the accounting practices provided for in this part; provided, that any municipality which adopts such ordinances after July 1, 1977, shall conform to the accounting practices as provided for in this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 17; T.C.A., § 48-2217; Acts 1989, ch. 285, § 33; T.C.A., § 48-3-518.

48-101-519. Registration — Written agreement.

No commercial co-venturer shall conduct any charitable sales promotion in this state on behalf of a charitable or civic organization unless the charitable or civic organization is duly registered or granted the appropriate exemption.

Prior to any charitable sales promotion in this state, the commercial co-venturer shall have a written agreement with the charitable or civic organization on whose behalf the charitable sales promotion is to be conducted. The agreement shall be signed by an authorized representative of the commercial co-venturer and two (2) officers of the charitable or civic organization.

The commercial co-venturer shall maintain all records in connection with the charitable sales promotion for a period of three (3) years after the end date of the charitable sales promotion. All charitable sales promotion records shall be made available to the division upon request.

Acts 2007, ch. 523, § 35.

48-101-520. Recovery of damages — Actions — Treble damages — Settlement — Attorney's fees.

Any solicitee or person who suffers an ascertainable loss of money or property, real, personal, or mixed, or any other article, commodity, or thing of value wherever situated, as a result of the use or employment by another person of an unfair, false, misleading or deceptive act or practice declared to be unlawful by this part or any other violation of this part, may bring an action individually to recover actual damages.

The action may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged unfair, false, misleading or deceptive act or practice, or other violation of this part, took place, is taking place, or is about to take place, or in the county in which such person conducting solicitations resides, has such person's principal place of conducting solicitations, conducts, transacts, or has transacted solicitations, or, if the person cannot be found in any of the foregoing locations, in the county in which such person can be found.

Any private action commenced under this part shall be brought within one (1) year from a person's discovery of the violation of this part, but in no event shall an action under this part be brought after four (4) years from the date of the solicitation giving rise to the claim for relief.

If the court finds that the use or employment of the unfair, false, misleading or deceptive act or practice or other violation was a willful or knowing violation of this part, the court may award three (3) times the actual damages sustained and may provide such other relief as it considers necessary and proper.

In determining whether treble damages should be awarded, the trial court may consider, among other things:

The competence of the solicitee;

The nature of the deception or coercion practiced upon the solicitee;

The damage to the solicitee; and

The good faith of the person found to have violated this part.

Without regard to any other remedy or relief to which a person is entitled, anyone affected by a violation of this part may bring an action to obtain a declaratory judgment that the act or practice violates this part and to enjoin the person who has violated, is violating or who is otherwise likely to violate this part; provided, that such action shall not be filed once the secretary of state has commenced a proceeding pursuant to § 48-101-514(c).

Any person who has been affected by an act or practice declared to be a violation of this part may accept any written reasonable offer of settlement made by the person or persons considered to have violated this part; provided, that the tender of acceptance of such a settlement offer shall not abate any proceeding commenced by the secretary of state pursuant to § 48-101-514(c).

Any permanent injunction, judgment, or final court order made pursuant to § 48-101-514(c), which has not been complied with, shall be prima facie evidence of the violation of this part in any action brought pursuant to this section.

Upon a finding by the court that a provision of this part has been violated, the court may award to the person bringing such action reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

Upon the commencement of any action brought under subsections (a) and (b), the clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the complaint or other initial pleading to the secretary of state and, upon the entry of any judgment, order, or decree shall mail a copy to the secretary of state.

Acts 1989, ch. 285, § 34; T.C.A., § 48-3-520.

48-101-521. Requirement of filing financial reports by charitable organizations soliciting and receiving contributions for disasters.

Any charitable organization, other than a bona fide religious institution, that solicits and receives contributions exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a charitable purpose related to a disaster in this state shall file quarterly financial reports with the secretary of state, on forms prescribed by the secretary of state, detailing the money raised and expended by the organization as a result of the solicitation, until the funds are expended. The first quarterly report shall be filed on the last day of the third month following the commencement of solicitations.

Any charitable organization other than a bona fide religious institution, which solicited and received contributions exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a charitable purpose related to a disaster in this state between May 1, 2010, and May 20, 2011, shall file a financial report with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, on June 30, 2011. The report shall detail all funds received and expended by the organization as a result of the solicitation. After June 30, 2011, the organization shall file quarterly financial reports with the secretary of state, on forms prescribed by the secretary of state, detailing the money raised and expended by the organization as a result of the solicitation, until the funds are expended.

Acts 2011, ch. 232, § 4; T.C.A § 48-101-522.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 48-101-522 by authority of the Code Commission in 2019.